es: Arte y ocio > Hobbies y artes creativas > Accesorios para instrumentos musicales y de orquesta > Accesorios para instrumentos de metal > Limpieza y cuidado de instrumentos de metal > Productos de limpieza y desinfectantes para instrumentos de metal: Limpiadores de orificios; Aerosoles desinfectantes; Limpiadores de varas; Limpiadores de válvulas
th: ศิลปะและความบันเทิง > งานอดิเรกและศิลปะสร้างสรรค์ > เครื่องดนตรีและอุปกรณ์ออร์เคสตรา > อุปกรณ์เครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > การดูแลและทำความสะอาดเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง > ที่ทำความสะอาดและที่ฆ่าเชื้อสำหรับเครื่องเป่าทองเหลือง: น้ำยาทำความสะอาดเจาะ; สเปรย์ฆ่าเชื้อ; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดสไลด์; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดวาล์ว
lt-LT: Menai ir pramogos > Hobiai ir menai > Muzikos instrumentai ir orkestro priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priedai > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų priežiūra ir valymas > Varinių pučiamųjų instrumentų valikliai ir dezinfekcijos priemonės: Skylių valikliai; Dezinfekciniai purškalai; Slankiklių valikliai; Vožtuvų valikliai
da: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og håndarbejde > Musikinstrumenter – tilbehør > Messingblæser – tilbehør > Messingblæser – pleje og rengøring > Messingblæser – rengøringsmidler: Borerensere; Desinfektionsspray; Sliderensere; Ventilrensere
ja: 芸術・エンターテイメント > 趣味・コレクション > 楽器関連用品 > 金管楽器用品 > 金管楽器お手入れ用品 > 金管楽器用クリーナー・洗浄液: ボアクリーナー; 消毒スプレー; スライドクリーナー; バルブクリーナー
tr: Sanat ve Eğlence > Hobiler ve Sanatsal Çalışmalar > Müzik Aleti ve Orkestra Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Aksesuarları > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Bakım ve Temizliği > Bakır Nefesli Çalgı Temizleyici ve Dezenfekte Ediciler: Delik Temizleyicileri; Dezenfektan Spreyler; Slayt Temizleyiciler; Valf Temizleyicileri
hu: Művészet és szórakoztatás > Hobbik és kreatív művészet > Hangszer és zenekari kiegészítők > Rézfúvóshangszer-kiegészítő > Rézfúvóshangszer-ápolás és -tisztítás > Rézfúvóshangszer-tisztítók és -fertőtlenítők: Furattisztítók; Fertőtlenítő spray-k; Diatisztítók; Szeleptisztítók
fr: Arts et loisirs > Loisirs et arts créatifs > Accessoires pour instruments de musique et orchestres > Accessoires pour cuivres > Entretien et nettoyage des cuivres > Produits nettoyants / assainissants pour cuivres: Nettoyeurs de cylindre; Sprays désinfectants; Produits nettoyants de coulisses; Nettoyeurs de valves
zh-TW: 藝術/娛樂 > 嗜好和創作藝術 > 樂器配件 > 銅管樂器配件 > 銅管樂器清潔保養品 > 銅管樂器清潔消毒劑: 內管清潔劑; 消毒噴霧劑; 滑音管清潔劑; 活塞清潔劑
fi: Taide ja viihde > Harrastukset ja taiteet > Soitin- ja orkesteritarvikkeet > Vaskipuhallintarvikkeet > Vaskipuhaltimien hoito ja puhdistus > Vaskipuhaltimien puhdistus- ja desinfiointiaineet: Aukkojen puhdistusharjat; Desinfiointisuihkeet; Luistipuhdistusaineet; Venttiilien puhdistusaineet
ro-RO: Artă și divertisment > Hobby-uri și artă > Accesorii pentru instrumente muzicale și orchestră > Accesorii pentru instrumente din alamă > Îngrijirea și curățarea instrumentelor din alamă > Produse de curățare și dezinfectare pentru instrumente din alamă: Dispozitive de curățare orificii; Sprayuri dezinfectante; Dispozitive de curățare elemente mobile; Dispozitive de curățare valve
pt-BR: Artes e entretenimento > Hobbies e artes > Acessórios para instrumentos musicais e orquestras > Acessórios para instrumentos de sopro de metal > Manutenção e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro de metal > Desinfetantes e limpadores de instrumentos de sopro de metal: Limpadores de furos; Sprays desinfetantes; Limpadores de vara; Limpadores de válvulas
nl: Kunst en entertainment > Hobby's en creatieve vaardigheden > Accessoires voor muziekinstrumenten > Accessoires voor koperen blaasinstrumenten > Onderhoud en reiniging van koperen blaasinstrumenten > Schoonmaakmiddelen voor koperen blaasinstrumenten: Schoonmaakmiddelen voor boringen; Desinfecterende sprays; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor schuiftrompetten; Schoonmaakmiddelen voor ventielen
de: Kunst & Unterhaltung > Hobby & Kunst > Zubehör für Musikinstrumente > Zubehör für Blechblasinstrumente > Blechblasinstrumentenpflege &-reinigung > Reinigungs- & Desinfektionsmittel für Blechblasinstrumente: Mensurreiniger; Desinfektionssprays; Zugbogenreiniger; Ventilreiniger
hr-HR: Umjetnost i zabava > Hobiji i kreativne umjetnosti > Pribor za glazbala i orkestar > Pribor za limena puhaća glazbala > Održavanje i čišćenje limenih puhaćih glazbala > Sredstva za čišćenje i dezinfekciju limenih puhaćih glazbala: Čistači cijevi; Sprejevi za dezinfekciju; Sredstva za čišćenje povlačka; Sredstva za čišćenje ventila
ko: 아트/엔터테인먼트 > 취미/예술 > 악기/오케스트라 부대용품 > 금관악기 부대용품 > 금관악기 관리/청소 용품 > 금관악기 클리너/소독용품: 보어 클리너; 살균 스프레이; 슬라이드 클리너; 밸브 클리너
pl: Sztuka i rozrywka > Hobby i sztuki piękne > Akcesoria do instrumentów muzycznych > Akcesoria do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Elementy konserwujące i czyszczące do instrumentów dętych blaszanych > Środki do czyszczenia i dezynfekcji instrumentów dętych blaszanych: Środki do czyszczenia instrumentów; Spraye dezynfekcyjne; Środki do czyszczenia suwaków; Środki do czyszczenia zaworów
el: Τέχνες & Ψυχαγωγία > Χόμπι & Δημιουργικές Τέχνες > Αξεσουάρ μουσικών οργάνων & ορχήστρας > Αξεσουάρ χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Φροντίδα & καθαρισμός χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων > Καθαριστικά & απολυμαντικά χάλκινων πνευστών οργάνων: Καθαριστικά εσωτερικής οπής (Πνευστών οργάνων); Απολυμαντικά σπρέι; Καθαριστικά σλάιντ; Καθαριστικά βαλβίδων
en: Arts & Entertainment > Hobbies & Creative Arts > Musical Instrument & Orchestra Accessories > Brass Instrument Accessories > Brass Instrument Care & Cleaning > Brass Instrument Cleaners & Sanitizers: Bore Cleaners; Disinfectant Sprays; Slide Cleaners; Valve Cleaners
zh-CN: 艺术与娱乐 > 爱好/艺术创作 > 乐器与管弦乐队配件 > 铜管乐器配件 > 铜管乐器清洁保养 > 铜管乐器清洁与消毒用品: 管孔清洁剂; 消毒剂喷雾; 伸缩管清洁剂; 活塞清洁剂
ru: Искусство и развлечения > Хобби и творчество > Аксессуары для музыкальных инструментов и игры в оркестре > Аксессуары для медных духовых инструментов > Чистка медных духовых инструментов и уход за ними > Средства для чистки медных духовых инструментов: Средства для чистки трубок; Дезинфицирующие спреи; Средство для чистки кулис; Средство для чистки вентилей
bg-BG: Изкуства и развлечения > Хобита и творчески изкуства > Аксесоари за музикални инструменти и оркестри > Аксесоари за духови инструменти > Грижа и почистване на духови инструменти > Препарати за почистване и дезинфекция на духови инструменти: Препарати за почистване на отвори; Дезинфекциращи спрейове; Почистващи средства за плъзгащи се тръби; Почистващи средства за клапани
sv: Konst och underhållning > Hobby och skapande > Tillbehör till musikinstrument > Tillbehör till bleckblåsinstrument > Vård och rengöring av bleckblåsinstrument > Rengöring och sterilisering av bleckblåsinstrument: Vapenrengöringsmedel, pipa; Desinficerande sprayer; Glidrengöringsmedel; Ventilrengörare
it: Arte e svago > Hobby e arti creative > Accessori per orchestre e strumenti musicali > Accessori per ottoni > Cura e pulitura ottoni > Prodotti pulizia/igienizzanti ottoni: Pulitori per fori; Spray disinfettanti; Pulitori scorrevoli; Pulitori per valvole
sl-SI: Kultura in zabava > Hobiji in ustvarjalne umetnosti > Dodatki za glasbila in orkestre > Dodatki za trobila > Nega in čiščenje trobil > Čistila in razkužila za trobila: Čistila za cevi orožja; Dezinfekcijska pršila; Čistila za drsnike; Čistila za ventile
vi: Nghệ thuật và giải trí > Sở thích và nghệ thuật sáng tạo > Phụ kiện dàn nhạc và nhạc cụ > Phụ kiện kèn đồng > Sản phẩm vệ sinh và chăm sóc kèn đồng > Sản phẩm làm sạch và vệ sinh kèn đồng: Sản phẩm làm sạch cổ kèn; Thuốc xịt khử trùng; Sản phẩm làm sạch thanh trượt; Sản phẩm làm sạch van
cs: Umění a zábava > Hobby, hudba a výtvarné umění > Hudební nástroje – příslušenství > Žesťové nástroje – příslušenství > Údržba a čištění žesťových nástrojů > Čisticí prostředky pro žesťové nástroje: Čističe otvorů dechových nástrojů; Dezinfekční spreje; Čističe tahů dechových nástrojů; Čističe ventilů dechových nástrojů
nb: Kunst og underholdning > Hobby og kreativitet > Tilbehør til musikkinstrumenter og orkestre > Tilbehør til messinginstrumenter > Pleie og rengjøring av messinginstrumenter > Rengjøringsmidler for messinginstrumenter: Piperensere; Desinfiserende sprayer; Sliderengjøring; Ventilrengjøring
sk-SK: Umenie a zábava > Záľuby a tvorivé dielne > Príslušenstvo pre hudobné nástroje > Príslušenstvo pre dychové nástroje > Starostlivosť a čistenie dychových nástrojov > Čistiace a dezinfekčné prostriedky na dychové nástroje: Čistiace prostriedky na hlaveň; Dezinfekčné spreje; Čistiace prostriedky na diapozitívy; Čistiace prostriedky na ventily
pt-PT: Artes e lazer > Passatempos e artes criativas > Acessórios de instrumentos musicais e orquestra > Acessórios de instrumentos de sopro > Limpeza e cuidado de instrumentos de sopro > Produtos de higiene e limpeza de instrumentos de sopro: Produtos de limpeza para tubos de instrumentos; Sprays desinfetantes; Produtos de limpeza para braço da vara; Produtos de limpeza para válvulas